Wyoming, session 2025, SF0115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-3-114(a) is amended to read:

16-3-114. Judicial review of agency actions; district
courts.

(a) Subject to the requirement that administrative
remedies be exhausted and in the absence of any statutory
or common-law provision precluding or limiting judicial
SF0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0660
review, Any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact
by a final decision of an agency in a contested case, or by
other agency action or inaction, or any person affected in
fact by a rule adopted by an agency, is entitled to
judicial review, subject to all of the following:

(i) Judicial review shall be in the district
court for the county in which the injury or harm for which
relief is sought occurred, in the district court for the
county in which the administrative action or inaction was
taken, or in which any real property affected by the
administrative action or inaction is located, or if no real
property is involved, in the district court for the county
in which the party aggrieved or adversely affected by the
administrative action or inaction resides or has its
principal place of business;.

(ii) The procedure to be followed in the
proceeding before the district court shall be in accordance
with rules heretofore or hereinafter adopted by the Wyoming
supreme court;

SF0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0660
(iii) All administrative remedies shall be
exhausted before a person seeks judicial review;

(iv) There is no statutory or common-law
provision that precludes or limits judicial review;

(v) The right of judicial review under this
subsection shall not apply to any action or inaction taken
in regards to the public employment of a person, unless:

(A) The action or inaction is the final
decision of an agency in a contested case; or

(B) Judicial review for the action or
inaction is otherwise provided by law.

Section 2. This act shall apply to agency actions and
inactions taken on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0115